Florida, session 2026, HB827.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Florida:

Section 1. Subsection (3) is added to section 689.261,
Florida Statutes, to read:
689.261 Sale of residential property; disclosure of
estimated ad valorem taxes to prospective purchaser.—
Page 1 of 4
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb827-01-c1

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
CS/HB 827 2026
(3)(a) As used in this subsection, the term:
1. "Listing platform" means any public-facing online real
property listing platform, including, but not limited to,
websites, web applications, and mobile applications.
2. "Property" means residential real property located
within this state.
(b) Property visible on a listing platform must include
the estimated ad valorem taxes for such property.
1. If the ad valorem taxes are estimated using a tax
estimator or buyer payment calculator, the current owner's ad
valorem assessment or taxes may not be used to calculate the
estimated ad valorem taxes. The listing platform must calculate
and display the estimated ad valorem taxes by showing the ad
valorem taxes that would be due if the purchaser were taxed on
the listing price of the property at either:
a. The current millage rates using the data and formula
published under subparagraph (d)1.; or
b. The countywide aggregate average millage rate using the
data published under subparagraph (d)2.

The use of the data and formulas provided in this subparagraph
constitutes a reasonable estimate of ad valorem taxes. The
listing platform must include a disclaimer on the same website
or application as the estimated ad valorem taxes that the
millage rates of applicable taxing authorities may vary within a
Page 2 of 4
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb827-01-c1

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
CS/HB 827 2026
county and that the estimated ad valorem taxes do not include
all applicable non-ad valorem assessments or exemptions,
discounts, and other tax benefits, including, but not limited
to, transfer of the homestead assessment difference under s. 4,
Art. VII of the State Constitution. The ad valorem taxes of the
current owner of the property and for any previous year may only
be displayed as part of historical tax information.
2. If ad valorem taxes are not estimated using a tax
estimator or buyer payment calculator as provided in sub-
paragraph 1., the listing platform shall include a link to the
property appraiser's tax estimator for the county in which the
property is located, if available, or to such property
appraiser's home page. The ad valorem taxes of the current owner
of the property and for any previous year may not be displayed
as part of historical tax information. The Department of Revenue
must maintain a table of links to each property appraiser's home
page and tax estimator, if available, on its website.
3. There shall be no liability on the part of, and no
cause of action of any nature shall arise against a listing
platform or licensee under chapter 475 for the accuracy of the
estimated ad valorem taxes of a property listed on a listing
platform.
(c) The current owner's ad valorem taxes may not be
included within any printed listing materials concerning a
property.
Page 3 of 4
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb827-01-c1

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
CS/HB 827 2026
(d) The Department of Revenue shall annually develop a:
1. Formula that may be used by a listing platform to
calculate the estimated ad valorem taxes required under sub-
subparagraph (b)1.a. The department shall require each property
appraiser to provide the department with any information needed
to develop the formula, including, at a minimum, the county
name, tax district code, summary school millage rate, and
summary millage rate for all other applicable taxing
authorities.
2. Countywide aggregate average millage rate for each
county that may be used by a listing platform as required under
sub-subparagraph (b)1.b.

The department shall require each property appraiser to provide
the department with any information needed to develop formula
under this subparagraph 1., and the countywide aggregate average
millage rate under this subparagraph 2. Beginning December 15,
2026, and annually thereafter, the department shall publish the
information, formula, and countywide aggregate average millage
rate for each county collected pursuant to this paragraph on its
website.
(e) The Department of Revenue may adopt rules to implement
paragraph (d).
Section 2. This act shall take effect February 1, 2027.
Page 4 of 4
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb827-01-c1